Tennessee statutes. Title 24 Evidence and Witnesses
Part 1

General Provisions

24-9-101. Deponents exempt from subpoena to trial but subject to subpoena to deposition — Award of fees and expenses if court grants motion to quash.

Deponents exempt from subpoena to trial but subject to subpoena to a deposition are:

An officer of the United States;

An officer of this state;

An officer of any court or municipality within the state;

The clerk of any court of record other than that in which the suit is pending;

A member of the general assembly while in session, or clerk or officer thereof;

A practicing physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, psychologist, senior psychological examiner, chiropractor, dentist or attorney;

A jailer or keeper of a public prison in any county other than that in which the suit is pending;

A custodian of medical records, if such custodian files a copy of the applicable records and an affidavit with the court and follows the procedures provided in title 68, chapter 11, part 4, for the production of hospital records pursuant to a subpoena duces tecum; and

A licensed clinical social worker, as defined in § 63-23-105 and engaged solely in independent clinical practice, in proceedings in which the department of children's services is the petitioner or intervening petitioner.

If the court grants a motion to quash a subpoena issued pursuant to subsection (a), the court may award the party subpoenaed its reasonable attorney's fees and expenses incurred in defending against the subpoena.

Acts 1986, ch. 750, § 1; 1991, ch. 456, § 1; 2006, ch. 729, § 1; 2009, ch. 55, § 1; 2012, ch. 678, § 1; 2014, ch. 590, § 1; 2016, ch. 980, § 1; 2018, ch. 851, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§24-9-101 —24-9-133 (Code 1858, §§ 3836, 3838-3856, 3858-3870, 3875 (deriv. acts 1794, ch. 1, §§ 30, 31; 1795, ch. 3, §§ 1, 2; 1801, ch. 6, §§ 32, 39; 1811, ch. 100, § 1; 1817, ch. 189, §§ 2, 3; 1817, ch. 199, § 5; 1824, ch. 6, § 2; 1826, ch. 24, § 1; 1826 Private, ch. 77, § 2; 1827, ch. 81, § 5; 1833, ch. 30, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 11, § 7; 1843-1844, ch. 158, §§ 1, 2; 1847-1848, ch. 17; 1851-1852, ch. 118; 1851-1852, ch. 128, § 1; 1851-1852, ch. 161); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 53, §§ 1, 2; 1859-1860, ch. 94; 1870, ch. 16, § 1; 1899, ch. 276, §§ 1, 2; 1909, ch. 160, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 5624, 5627-5647, 5649-5654, 5656-5663, 5668; Acts 1923, ch. 26, § 1; Shan. Supp., 5668a12; Mod. Code 1932, §§ 98061, 9809-9829, 9831-9853; Acts 1949, ch. 126, § 1; C. Supp., 1950, § 9806; Acts 1959, ch. 275, §§ 2, 3-7; 1963, ch. 321, § 1; 1976, ch. 527, §§ 1-3; 1982, ch. 754, § 1; 1983, ch. 41, § 1; 1986, ch. 584, §§ 1, 2), concerning depositions, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 750, § 1.

Acts 1986, ch. 584, §§ 1 and 2, effective March 24, 1986, purportedly amended former §24-9-105 and added a new section to this chapter which would have been designated §24-9-134; however, Acts 1986, ch. 750, § 1, effective July 1, 1986, repealed this chapter in its entirety. The provisions in Acts 1986, ch. 584, §§ 1 and 2 are deemed repealed by chapter 750. Section24-9-134, had it taken effect, would have read:

“(a) The witness, if he is a practicing physician, shall be exempt from appearance in court to testify, provided he clearly states his profession in his deposition. No subpoena need be served on such a witness in order for such exemption to be valid.

“(b) If the witness fails to claim exemption at the time mentioned, he may be allowed the benefit of it, by application to the court.

“(c) A false claim set up by the witness shall in no way affect the right of the party summoning the witness under the provisions of this Code, and the burden of proof is on the witness, upon scire facias, to show the fact entitling him to exemption.”

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (a)(9).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 851, § 2. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Clerk's fees, §8-21-401.

Depositions by physicians, §50-6-235.

Depositions of members of armed forces, §§58-1-604 —58-1-606.

Depositions previously filed in federal court, §16-1-111.

Evidence at trials, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 43.

Laws in conflict with court rules nullified, §16-3-406.

Medical attendance and hospitalization, reports, physical examinations, §50-6-204.

Notary fee, §8-21-1201.

Power of clerks to take depositions, §§18-1-108,18-6-113.

Retaking testimony after loss of deposition, §24-8-110.

Scope of discovery, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 26.

Subpoena for a hearing or trial; personal attendance, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 45.05.

Testimony of convict, §41-21-304(a).

Rule Reference. This chapter is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 26 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments of Rule 32, and in the Advisory Commission Comments of Rule 45 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 1-32.01-1, 1-45.01-1, 1-45.05-1.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 804(a).5.

Law Reviews.

Evidentiary Privileges Against The Production Of Data Within The Control Of Executive Departments (William V. Sanford), 3 Vand. L. Rev. 73.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Statutory Construction — Restriction of Application of Statute to Contemporary Circumstances — Parties as “Witnesses” under Tennessee Deposition Statute, 3 Vand. L. Rev. 666.

Suggested Changes in Pre-Trial Procedure, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 201.

Tennessee and Federal Rules of Civil Procedure (Donald F. Paine), 27 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 25 (1991).

The Present Status of Discovery Before Trial in Actions at Law in Tennessee, 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 439.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.

1. Construction and Interpretation.
2. —Deposition of Witness Not Exempt from Trial.

24-9-102. General sessions cases.

Discovery pursuant to Rules 26-37 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure, excluding physical and mental examinations under Rule 35 of such rules, may be taken in all civil cases pending in the courts of general sessions in the discretion of the court after motion showing both good cause and exceptional circumstances and pursuant to an order describing the extent and conditions of such discovery.

Depositions of custodians of hospital and medical records may be taken in all cases pending before the judges of the courts of general sessions, under the same rules, regulations, and restrictions as in cases pending in the courts of record.

Acts 1986, ch. 750, § 1; 1988, ch. 943, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see the Compiler's Notes under §24-9-101.

Cross-References. Laws in conflict with court rules nullified, §16-3-406.

24-9-103. [Reserved.]

Any court of record, or any clerk thereof, may issue commissions to take depositions.

Acts 1991, ch. 273, § 37.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see the Compiler's Notes under §24-9-101.

24-9-105 — 24-9-134. [Reserved.]

Depositions taken in this state that are to be used in its courts shall be taken before:

A hearing examiner;

A judge, clerk, commissioner, or official reporter of a court;

A licensed court reporter;

A notary public; or

Before other persons and under other circumstances authorized by law.

Acts 2000, ch. 741, § 1; 2010, ch. 1123, § 9.

Cross-References. Depositions, §18-6-113.

24-9-136. Persons before whom depositions not to be taken — Disclosure of prohibited relationship — Video recording by lawyer or lawyer's agent — Election to void deposition.

Unless all of the parties have entered into a written stipulation otherwise pursuant to Rule 29 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure, a deposition shall not be taken before a person who is:

A party to the action or an attorney for one (1) of the parties;

A relative, including a spouse of one (1) of the parties or of an attorney for one (1) of the parties;

An employee of one (1) of the parties or of an attorney for one (1) of the parties. As used in this subdivision (a)(3), “employee” includes a person who has a contractual relationship with a person or entity interested in the outcome of the litigation, including anyone who may ultimately be responsible for payment to provide reporting or other court services, and a person who is employed part-time or full-time under contract or otherwise by a person who has a contractual relationship with a party to provide reporting or other court services; provided, however, that this subdivision (a)(3) shall not restrict in any way the ability of an attorney or a pro se litigant to hire court reporting services on a case-by-case basis in any case where the attorney is not a party, nor restrict an attorney from reimbursement for such court reporting services;

Someone who has, or has had during the past two (2) years, a sexual relationship with one (1) of the parties or with an attorney for one (1) of the parties; or

Someone with a financial interest in the action or its outcome.

The person before whom a deposition is to be taken shall disclose to the parties in a timely fashion the existence of any facts known to the person that are relevant to factors set forth in subsection (a).

A person commits a Class C misdemeanor who takes a deposition and knowingly fails or refuses to disclose any facts required by subdivision (b)(1).

Notwithstanding this section, if a videotaped deposition has been agreed to or ordered by the court pursuant to Rule 30 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure, any lawyer or lawyer's agent may operate the video equipment pursuant to Rules 28.01 and 30.02(4)(B).

A deposition taken by a person described in subsection (a) is voidable at the election of any party unless:

After compliance with subsection (b), the parties have entered into a stipulation pursuant to Rule 29 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure;

An order has been entered pursuant to Rule 30.02(4)(A) of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure; or

The party attempting to void the deposition has violated this section directly or through a related person described in subsection (a).

An election to void a deposition pursuant to this section shall be made within thirty (30) days of discovery of the violation of this section.

This section shall not apply to contracts for court reporting services for the courts, agencies or instrumentalities of the United States or the state of Tennessee.

Acts 2000, ch. 741, § 2; 2002, ch. 612, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 427, § 1; 2010, ch. 1016, § 1.

Cross-References. Depositions, §18-6-113.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Person forbidden to take deposition pursuant to §24-9-136 not to record or transcribe any hearing concerning action, §24-9-137.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text and Advisory Commission Comments of Rule 28 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

Attorney General Opinions. Timeliness of notification of conflicts of interest by persons taking depositions. OAG 10-114, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 120 (11/24/10).

Deposition stipulation is not limited to notice, time extensions, place, and manner. The disqualification provisions of T.C.A. §24-9-135(a)(3), (5) may be waived by stipulation, including the disqualification for an employee by one of the parties or of an attorney for one of the parties or someone with a financial interest in the action or its outcome. OAG 14-40, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 39 (3/31/14).

24-9-137. Person forbidden to take deposition pursuant to § 24-9-136 not to record or transcribe any hearing concerning action.

Any person forbidden to take a deposition in an action pursuant to §24-9-136 shall not record or transcribe for submission to any court or administrative tribunal any hearing before any court or administrative agency concerning the action.

Acts 2009, ch. 427, § 2.

Cross-References. Persons before whom depositions not to be taken, §24-9-136.